North Carolina, session 2025, HB293.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 16A of Chapter 113 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 113-219. Aquaculture of any species of octopus unlawful.
(a) For the purposes of this section, the term "octopus" means a cephalopod mollusk with
a soft body and eight limbs belonging to the order Octopoda and does not include wild caught
octopuses or octopuses propagated, cultivated, maintained, reared, or harvested only for research
purposes unrelated to commercial production.
(b) No person shall engage in the aquaculture of any species of octopus in the State for
the purpose of human consumption.
(c) No business entity shall sell, possess, or transport any species of octopus in the State
that is the result or product of aquaculture.
(d) A person who violates any provision of this section, or any rule or regulation adopted
pursuant thereto, shall be subject, upon order of a court, to a civil penalty not to exceed one
thousand dollars ($1,000) per day of the violation, and each day during which the violation
continues shall constitute an additional, separate, and distinct offense.
(e) The Department may adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this
section."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H293-v-1*